Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-135] Subordinate compelling
surrender. Any person subject to this chapter who compels or attempts to
compel the commander of any of the state military forces of the State, or of
any other state, to give it up to an enemy or to abandon it, or who strikes the
colors or flag to an enemy without proper authority, shall be punished as a
court-martial may direct. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next